Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6107
Registration; required; exceptions.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2025, it is unlawful for any person to use the title registered interior designer or similar description to convey the impression that such person is a registered interior designer unless the person is registered under the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act.

(2) Nothing in the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act shall be construed to: (a) Require a person to be a registered interior designer in order to engage in an activity traditionally performed by an interior designer or interior decorator, including any professional service limited to the planning, design, and implementation of kitchen and bathroom spaces or the specification of products for kitchen and bathroom areas; or (b) prevent or restrict the practice, service, or activity of any person licensed to practice a profession or an occupation in this state from engaging in such profession or occupation.

(3) A licensed architect holding a license in good standing under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act may register with the State Treasurer as a registered interior designer without having to meet the registration requirements outlined in section 71-6105.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 20.

Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.